Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 2
Judicial Resolution

§ 15-8-201. Persons entitled to judicial proceedings for declaration of rights or legal relations.

Any party may have a judicial proceeding for the declaration of rights or legal relations with respect to:

Any matter, as defined in section 15-8-103, Idaho Code;

The resolution of any other case or controversy that arises under the Idaho Code and referenced judicial proceedings under this chapter; or

The determination of the persons entitled to notice under section 15-8-204, Idaho Code.

The provisions of this chapter apply to disputes arising in connection with estates of incapacitated persons unless otherwise covered by chapter 5, title 15, Idaho Code. The provisions of this chapter shall not supersede, but shall supplement, any otherwise applicable provisions and procedures contained in title 15, Idaho Code, or other Idaho law. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to actions for wrongful death under any other chapter or title of Idaho Code.

§ 15-8-202. Judicial proceedings.

The provisions of this chapter shall control over any inconsistent provision of the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

A judicial proceeding under this chapter may be commenced as a new action or as an action incidental to an existing judicial proceeding relating to the same trust or estate or nonprobate asset.

Once commenced, the action may be consolidated with an existing proceeding or converted to a separate action upon the motion of a party for good cause shown, or by the court on its own motion.

The Idaho rules of civil procedure apply to judicial proceedings under this chapter only to the extent that they are consistent with this chapter, unless otherwise provided by Idaho Code, or ordered by the court under section 15-8-102, Idaho Code, or provided by other applicable Idaho rules of civil procedure.

§ 15-8-203. Procedural rules.

The Idaho rules of civil procedure apply to all proceedings under part 2 of this chapter.

§ 15-8-204. Notice in judicial proceedings under this chapter requiring notice.

Subject to section 15-8-207, Idaho Code, in all judicial proceedings under this chapter that require notice, the notice must be personally served on or mailed to all parties or the parties’ virtual representatives at least fourteen (14) days before the hearing on the petition, unless a different period is provided by statute or ordered by the court. The date of service shall be determined under the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

Proof of the service or mailing required in this section must be made by affidavit or declaration filed at or before the hearing.

§ 15-8-205. Application of doctrine of virtual representation.

This section is intended to adopt the common law concept of virtual representation. This section supplements the common law relating to the doctrine of virtual representation and the provisions of section 15-1-403, Idaho Code, and shall not be construed as limiting the application of that common law doctrine or the provisions of section 15-1-403, Idaho Code.

Any notice requirement in this chapter is satisfied if notice is given as follows:

Where an interest in an estate, trust, or nonprobate asset, or an interest that may be affected by a power of attorney, has been given to persons who comprise a certain class upon the happening of a certain event, notice may be given to the living persons who would constitute the class if the event had happened immediately before the commencement of the proceedings requiring notice, and the persons shall virtually represent all other members of the class;

Where an interest in an estate, trust, or nonprobate asset, or an interest that may be affected by a power of attorney, has been given to a living person, and the same interest, or a share in it, is to pass to the surviving spouse or to persons who are, or might be, the distributees, heirs, issue, or other kindred of that living person upon the happening of a future event, notice may be given to that living person, and the living person shall virtually represent the surviving spouse, distributees, heirs, issue, or other kindred of the person; and

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), where an interest in an estate, trust, or nonprobate asset, or an interest that may be affected by a power of attorney, has been given to a person or a class of persons, or both, upon the happening of any future event, and the same interest or a share of the interest is to pass to another person or class of persons, or both, upon the happening of an additional future event, notice may be given to the living person or persons who would take the interest upon the happening of the first event, and the living person or persons shall virtually represent the persons and classes of persons who might take upon the happening of the additional future event.

A party is not virtually represented by a person receiving notice if a conflict of interest involving the matter is known to exist between the notified person and the party.

An action taken by the court is conclusive and binding upon each person receiving actual or constructive notice or who is otherwise virtually represented.

§ 15-8-206. Special notice.

Nothing in this chapter eliminates the requirement to give notice to a person who has filed a demand for notice pursuant to section 15-3-204, Idaho Code.

§ 15-8-207. Waiver of notice.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, notice of a hearing does not need to be given to a legally competent person who has waived in writing notice of the hearing in person or by attorney, or who has appeared at the hearing without objecting to the lack of proper notice or personal jurisdiction. The waiver of notice may apply either to a specific hearing or to any and all hearings and proceedings to be held, in which event the waiver of notice is of continuing effect unless subsequently revoked by the filing of a written notice of revocation of the waiver and the mailing of a copy of the notice of revocation of the waiver to the other parties. Unless notice of a hearing is required to be given by publication, if all persons entitled to notice of the hearing waive the notice or appear at the hearing without objecting to the lack of proper notice or personal jurisdiction, the court may hear the matter immediately. A guardian or conservator or a guardian ad litem may make the waivers on behalf of the incapacitated person, and a trustee may make the waivers on behalf of any competent or incapacitated beneficiary of the trust. A consul or other representative of a foreign government, whose appearance has been entered as provided by law on behalf of any person residing in a foreign country, may make the waiver of notice on behalf of the person.

§ 15-8-208. Cost — Attorney’s fees.

Either the district court or the court on appeal may, in its discretion, order costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees, to be awarded to any party:

From any party to the proceedings;

From the assets of the estate or trust involved in the proceedings; or

From any nonprobate asset that is the subject of the proceedings. The court may order the costs to be paid in such amount and in such manner as the court determines to be equitable.

This section applies to all proceedings governed by this chapter including, but not limited to, proceedings involving trusts, decedent’s estates and properties, and guardianship matters. Except as provided in section 12-117, Idaho Code, this section shall not be construed as being limited by any other specific statutory provision providing for the payment of costs, unless such statute specifically provides otherwise.

§ 15-8-209. Appointment of a guardian ad litem.

The court, upon its own motion or upon request of one (1) or more of the parties, at any stage of a judicial proceeding or at any time in a nonjudicial resolution procedure, may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of a minor, or incapacitated, or unborn, or unascertained person, or any person whose identity or address is unknown, or a designated class of persons who are not ascertained or are not in being. If not precluded by a conflict of interest, a guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

The court appointed guardian ad litem supersedes the special representative if so provided in the court order.

The court may appoint the guardian ad litem at an ex parte hearing, or the court may order a hearing as provided in section 15-8-201, Idaho Code, with notice as provided in this section and section 15-8-204, Idaho Code.

The guardian ad litem is entitled to reasonable compensation for services. Such compensation is to be paid from the principal of the estate or trust whose beneficiaries are represented.

§ 15-8-210. Trial by jury.

If a party is entitled to a trial by jury and a jury is demanded, and the issues are not sufficiently made up by the written pleadings on file, the court, on due notice, shall settle and frame the issues to be tried. Any jury for any proceeding under this part 2[, chapter 8, title 15, Idaho Code,] shall consist of six (6) jurors. If a jury is not demanded, the court shall try the issues, and sign and file its findings and decision in writing, as provided for in civil actions.

§ 15-8-211. Execution on judgments.

Judgment on the issues, as well as for costs, may be entered and enforced by execution or otherwise by the court as in civil actions.

§ 15-8-212. Appellate review.

An interested party may seek appellate review of a final order, judgment, or decree of the court respecting a judicial proceeding under this chapter. The review must be done in the manner and way provided by law for appeals in civil actions.